Arkansas, session 2025, HB1896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Junk Fee Eliminating
Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of Information Network of
Arkansas.
(a) The Information Network of Arkansas is abolished, and its
authority, duties, function, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds,
including the functions of budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the
Division of Information Systems.
*LGL155*
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
(b) The Information Network of Arkansas's statutory powers, duties,
and functions, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records,
contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, and other funds are transferred to the Division of Information
Systems.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Information Network of Arkansas does not
affect the orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards
made or promulgated by the Information Network of Arkansas before the
effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or
standards of the Information Network of Arkansas shall continue to be in
effect until they are amended or repealed under authority given by law.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-12-1507 is amended to read as follows:
12-12-1507. Administration.
(a)(1) Release of criminal history information under this subchapter
shall be made only by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas
State Police and the Arkansas Crime Information Center as authorized by law.
(2) The Division of Arkansas State Police and the center may
adopt rules consistent with the provisions and intent of this subchapter.
(b) The division Division of Arkansas State Police and the center may
contract with the Information Network of Arkansas under the Information
Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et seq., Division of Information Systems
or any other qualified third-party vendor in the establishment of the gateway
or means of electronically processing transactions under this subchapter.
(c)(1) The division Division of Arkansas State Police shall not
process a request for a Federal Bureau of Investigation background check
unless a corresponding state background check through the Identification
Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police has also been properly
requested pursuant to this subchapter.
(2) The requirements of subdivision (c)(1) of this section may be
waived upon written authorization of the Director of the Division of Arkansas
State Police.
(d) The Division of Arkansas State Police automated fingerprint
identification system may access and use the National Fingerprint File and
Interstate Identification Index as provided by the Federal Bureau of
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
Investigation when the Arkansas Code authorizes a fingerprint-based Federal
Bureau of Investigation check for a noncriminal justice purpose and a
positive identification based on fingerprints is made.
(e) A background check request for a noncriminal justice purpose that
must be completed under state or federal law through the division Division of
Arkansas State Police shall be submitted to the division Division of Arkansas
State Police by electronic means through the Online Criminal Background Check
System.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-92-118(a)-(d) are amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) Notwithstanding § 16-13-709, the quorum court of each county of
this state may delegate the responsibility for the electronic collection of
fines assessed in a circuit court of this state within that county to the
Administrative Office of the Courts or the Information Network of Arkansas.
(2) Fines collected in each circuit court by the Administrative
Office of the Courts or the Information Network of Arkansas shall be remitted
by the fifth working day of the following month to the county official,
agency, or department designated under § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible
for the collection of fines assessed in that circuit court to be disbursed to
the appropriate county fund, state entity, or state agency as provided by
law.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding § 16-13-709, the governing body or, if
applicable and by mutual agreement, each governing body of a political
subdivision that contributes to the expenses of a district court or the
governing body of the city in which a city court is located may designate the
responsibility for the electronic collection of fines assessed in that
district court or that city court to the Administrative Office of the Courts
or the Information Network of Arkansas.
(2) Fines collected in each district court or each department of
district court by the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Information
Network of Arkansas shall be remitted by the fifth working day of the
following month to the county or city official, agency, or department
designated under § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of
fines assessed in that district court to be disbursed under § 16-17-707.
(c) Fines collected in each city court by the Administrative Office of
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
the Courts or the Information Network of Arkansas shall be disbursed by the
fifth working day of the following month to the city official, agency, or
department designated under § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the
collection of fines assessed in that city court to be disbursed to the
general fund or other city fund, state agency, or state entity as provided by
law.
(d)(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts or the Information
Network of Arkansas shall be allowed to charge a transaction fee for any
electronic payment of a court-ordered fine by an approved credit card or
debit card.
(2) The fee provided for in subdivision (d)(1) of this section
collected by the Administrative Office of the Courts shall be deposited by
the fifth day of each month into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement
Fund established by § 16-13-712.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1074 is repealed.
19-5-1074. Information Network of Arkansas Fund.
All moneys received by the Information Network of Arkansas from gifts,
donations, grants, or any other sources available by law shall be deposited
into the State Treasury and credited to the Information Network of Arkansas
Fund, which is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of
State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State until expended or otherwise
exhausted pursuant to the Information Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et
seq.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 25-27-101 is repealed.
25-27-101. Title.
This chapter may be cited as and shall be known as the “Information
Network of Arkansas Act”.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 25-27-102 is amended to read as follows:
25-27-102. Definitions
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agency” means any agency, department, office, board,
commission, public instrumentality, political subdivision, or any of the
foregoing entities acting on behalf of the State of Arkansas which store,
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
gather, or generate public information;
(2) “Gateway system” means any centralized electronic
information system by which public information shall be disseminated or
collected via the internet, dial-in modem, continuous link, or other
electronic medium; and
(3) “I.N.A.” means the Information Network of Arkansas, or, if
the Information Network of Arkansas shall be abolished, the board, body, or
commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the
powers given by this chapter to the Information Network of Arkansas shall be
given by law;
(4) “Network manager” means the entity or person designated by
contractual obligation to establish, develop, operate, maintain, and expand
the gateway system on behalf of the Information Network of Arkansas;
(5)(3) “Public information” means any information stored,
gathered, or generated in electronic or magnetic form by an agency, its
agencies, or instrumentalities, which is included within the information
deemed to be public pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-
19-101 et seq., and other provisions of the Arkansas Code providing for
release of information to the public at large to specified groups or
recipients; and
(6) “User association” means an association:
(A) Whose membership is identifiable by regular payment of
association dues and regularly maintained membership lists;
(B) Which is registered with the Secretary of State as an
Arkansas corporation;
(C) Which exists for the purpose of advancing the common
occupation or profession of its membership; and
(D) Which, after the appointment of the initial Board of
the Information Network of Arkansas, regularly promotes and encourages the
subscription of its members to the gateway system developed by the
Information Network of Arkansas.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 25-27-103 is repealed.
25-27-103. Board.
(a) There is created the Information Network of Arkansas, a public
instrumentality carrying out an essential government function, which shall be
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
governed by a Board of the Information Network of Arkansas consisting of
twelve (12) voting members, as follows:
(1) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
or his or her designee;
(2) The Secretary of State, or the Secretary of State's
designee;
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration, or his or her designee;
(4) Two (2) members, or their designees, who are chief executive
officers of agencies of the executive branch other than the Department of
Finance and Administration and the Division of Information Systems, shall be
appointed by the Governor;
(5)(A)(i)(a) Four (4) members from user associations initially
selected by the Governor shall be appointed by the Governor after consulting
each user association.
(b) Members appointed by the Governor under
subdivision (a)(5)(A)(i)(a) of this section shall be subject to confirmation
by the Senate.
(ii) No two (2) members appointed pursuant to this
subdivision (a)(5) shall be members of the same user association.
(B) Such members shall serve staggered three-year terms;
(6)(A) One (1) member who is a public library director appointed
by the Governor after consulting the President of the Arkansas Library
Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(B) The member shall serve a three-year term;
(7)(A) One (1) member appointed by the Governor after consulting
the Arkansas Bar Association and subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(B) The member shall serve a three-year term; and
(8) The Director of the Division of Information Systems, or the
Director of the Division of Information Systems' designee.
(b)(1) The board shall annually elect one (1) member from the board as
chair of the board.
(2) The board may also elect a vice chair and a secretary.
(c)(1) Six (6) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and the
affirmative vote of six (6) members shall be necessary for any action taken
by the board.
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
(2) No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the
right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all the duties of the
board.
(d) The board shall meet at least semiannually.
(e) Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be
eligible to receive reimbursement for mileage and reimbursement for expenses
in accordance with § 25-16-902.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 25-27-104 is amended to read as follows:
25-27-104. Duties.
(a) The Information Network of Arkansas Division of Information
Systems shall have the following duties:
(1) To develop and implement an electronic gateway system to
provide electronic access to members of the public to public information and
to develop, implement, and promote the use of electronic commerce and digital
signature applications within the state in cooperation with the Division of
Information Systems;
(2) To provide appropriate oversight of the network manager;
(3)(A) To establish charges for the services provided by the
division Information Network of Arkansas.
(B) The Information Network of Arkansas shall on a
quarterly basis submit a report of any change in charges for services to the:
(i) Legislative Council; and
(ii) Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and
Information Technology; and
(4) To explore ways of expanding the amount and kind of public
information provided, increasing the utility and form of the public
information provided, and implement such changes as required to be consistent
with the provisions of this chapter;
(5)(3) To explore ways of improving citizen and business access
to public information and, where appropriate, implementing such changes;
(6) To explore ways of expanding a gateway system and its
services to citizens and businesses by providing add-on services to the
public, such as access to other for-profit information databases, electronic
mail, and calendaring;
(7) To serve in an advisory capacity to the Department of
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
Finance and Administration, the division, and other state agencies regarding
the dissemination to and collection of state data for the citizens and
businesses of Arkansas;
(8) To seek advice from the general public, its subscribers,
professional associations, academic groups, and institutions and individuals
with knowledge or interest in computer networking, electronic mail, public
information access, gateway services, add-on services, and electronic filing
of information; and
(9) To accept gifts, donations, and grants for the support of a
gateway system in Arkansas.
(b)(1) All state agencies shall participate with the Information
Network of Arkansas division in providing assistance as may be requested for
the achievement of its purpose of implementing this section.
(2) Services and information to be provided by any agency shall
be specified pursuant to a contract between the Information Network of
Arkansas and such an agency.
(3) Agencies may contract to recover from the Information
Network of Arkansas costs incurred by providing such assistance to the
Information Network of Arkansas.
(4) The Information Network of Arkansas shall cooperate with the
division to fulfill the purposes of the Arkansas Information Systems Act of
1997, § 25-4-101 et seq.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 25-27-105 is repealed.
25-27-105. Network manager.
(a)(1) The Information Network of Arkansas shall procure a network
manager after developing, in consultation with the Division of Information
Systems, criteria and specifications for such a network manager and his or
her duties.
(2)(A) The Information Network of Arkansas may negotiate and
enter into a contract with the network manager.
(B) The contract shall specify the duties and
responsibilities of the network manager and shall also include any other
terms necessary to the agreement.
(b) The network manager shall:
(1) Direct and supervise the day-to-day operations and expansion
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
of the gateway system, including the initial phase of operations necessary to
make the gateway system operational;
(2) Attend meetings of the Information Network of Arkansas;
(3) Keep a record of all gateway, network, and related
operations of the Information Network of Arkansas. The records shall be the
property of the Information Network of Arkansas;
(4) Maintain and be a custodian of all financial and operational
records, documents, and papers filed with the Information Network of
Arkansas;
(5) Update and revise on a yearly basis the business plan of the
Information Network of Arkansas in consultation with and under the direction
of the Information Network of Arkansas;
(6) Submit to the Information Network of Arkansas quarterly
financial reports, an annual audit, an annual report, and any other
information requested by the Board of the Information Network of Arkansas;
and
(7) Perform other such activities or services as requested or
authorized by the Information Network of Arkansas consistent with the
provisions of this chapter.
(c) The division may provide to the Information Network of Arkansas
such staff and other assistance under contract.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 27-50-906(a)(2)(B), concerning fees
charged under a central driver's records file, is repealed.
(B) The Information Network of Arkansas may charge an
additional fee under the Information Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et
seq., for the service of transmitting this information electronically.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 27-50-906(c), concerning fees charged
under a central driver's records file, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) The fee for an insured's or applicant's driver confirmation
record shall be ten cents (10¢) per record.
(B)(2) This The fee under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be deposited into the fund as a direct revenue to be used by the
division.
(2) The network may charge an additional fee under the
03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155

HB1896
Information Network of Arkansas Act, § 25-27-101 et seq., for the service of
transmitting this information electronically.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 27-50-912(f)(4), concerning fees for the
driver monitoring program report, is repealed.
(4) The Information Network of Arkansas may charge insurers or
their agents an additional fee under the Information Network of Arkansas Act,
§ 25-27-101 et seq., for transmitting a driver monitoring report
electronically.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on
and after January 1, 2026.
























03/27/2025 8:25:58 AM LGL155